Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB5.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
All incarcerated youth are subject to search at any time. Searches shall be conducted in
a professional and respectful manner, in the least intrusive manner possible, and
consistent with security needs.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Changing room" means a room or area in which a person may be in a
state of undress in the presence of others, including a locker room or
shower room;
(b) "Female" means an individual whose biological reproductive system is
developed to produce ova; who has, had, will have or would have, but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for
fertilization;
(c) "Male" means an individual whose biological reproductive system is
developed to fertilize the ova of a female; who has, had, will have or would
have, but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the
reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes
sperm for fertilization;
(d) "Sex" means an individual's biological sex, either male or female, as
observed or clinically verified at birth. Gender identity and other subjective
terms shall not be used as synonyms or substitutes for sex; and
(e) "Sleeping quarters" means a room with more than one (1) bed and in
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 424
which more than one (1) individual is housed overnight.
(2) A facility shall designate each multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, and
sleeping quarters for the exclusive use of either females, males, or members of
the same family.
(3) (a) A restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarters within a facility that is
designated for females or males shall be used only by members of that sex.
An individual shall not enter a restroom, changing room, or sleeping
quarters that is designated for females or males unless he or she is a
member of that sex.
(b) A facility shall take reasonable steps to provide individuals with privacy in
restrooms, changing rooms, and sleeping quarters from members of the
opposite sex.
(4) This section does not apply to an individual who enters a restroom, changing
room, or sleeping quarters designated for the opposite sex to:
(a) Perform custodial services or maintenance;
(b) Render medical assistance;
(c) Render assistance by law enforcement; or
(d) Provide services or render aid during a natural disaster, a declared
emergency, or when necessary to prevent a serious threat to good order or
safety.
(5) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a facility from adopting policies
necessary to accommodate persons protected under the Americans with
Disabilities Act when using restrooms, changing rooms, or sleeping quarters.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 197 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
All inmates are subject to search at any time. Searches shall be conducted in a
professional and respectful manner, in the least intrusive manner possible, and
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 424
consistent with security needs.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 197 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cosmetic service" or "elective procedure" means any procedure,
treatment, or surgery to enhance or alter appearance to any areas of the
head, neck, and body, including but not limited to:
1. Prescribing or administering cross-sex hormones in amounts greater
than would normally be produced endogenously in a healthy person of
the same age and sex; and
2. Performing any gender reassignment surgery to alter or remove
physical or anatomical characteristics or features that are typical for a
person’s sex in order to instill or create physiological or anatomical
characteristics that resemble a different sex;
(b) "Public funds" means any money, regardless of the original source of the
money, of:
1. The Commonwealth of Kentucky, and any department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
2. Any county, city, local school district, or special district, and any
department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and
3. Any other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, and any
department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and
(c) "Sex" means the biological indication of male and female as evidenced by
sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and
nonambiguous internal and external genitalia present at birth.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, public funds shall not be
directly or indirectly used, granted, paid, or distributed for the purpose of
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 424
providing a cosmetic service or elective procedure to an inmate in a correctional
facility.
(3) The prohibitions of subsection (2) of this section do not include prescribing or
administering cross-sex hormones to an inmate if the inmate was undergoing this
treatment upon admission to the correctional facility and physical harm would
result from its discontinuation.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 197 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Changing room" means a room or area in which a person may be in a
state of undress in the presence of others, including a locker room or
shower room;
(b) "Female" means an individual whose biological reproductive system is
developed to produce ova; who has, had, will have or would have, but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for
fertilization;
(c) "Male" means an individual whose biological reproductive system is
developed to fertilize the ova of a female; who has, had, will have or would
have, but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the
reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes
sperm for fertilization;
(d) "Sex" means an individual's biological sex, either male or female, as
observed or clinically verified at birth. Gender identity and other subjective
terms shall not be used as synonyms or substitutes for sex; and
(e) "Sleeping quarters" means a room with more than one (1) bed and in
which more than one (1) individual is housed overnight.
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 424
(2) A correctional facility shall designate each multi-occupancy restroom, changing
room, and sleeping quarters for the exclusive use of either females, males, or
members of the same family.
(3) (a) A restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarters within a correctional
facility that is designated for females or males shall be used only by
members of that sex. An individual shall not enter a restroom, changing
room, or sleeping quarters that is designated for females or males unless he
or she is a member of that sex.
(b) A correctional facility shall take reasonable steps to provide individuals with
privacy in restrooms, changing rooms, and sleeping quarters from members
of the opposite sex.
(4) This section does not apply to an individual who enters a restroom, changing
room, or sleeping quarters designated for the opposite sex to:
(a) Perform custodial services or maintenance;
(b) Render medical assistance;
(c) Render assistance by law enforcement; or
(d) Provide services or render aid during a natural disaster, a declared
emergency, or when necessary to prevent a serious threat to good order or
safety.
(5) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a correctional facility from
adopting policies necessary to accommodate persons protected under the
Americans with Disabilities Act when using restrooms, changing rooms, or
sleeping quarters.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
All prisoners are subject to search at any time. Searches shall be conducted in a
professional and respectful manner, in the least intrusive manner possible, and
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 424
consistent with security needs.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Changing room" means a room or area in which a person may be in a
state of undress in the presence of others, including a locker room or
shower room;
(b) "Female" means an individual whose biological reproductive system is
developed to produce ova; who has, had, will have or would have, but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for
fertilization;
(c) "Male" means an individual whose biological reproductive system is
developed to fertilize the ova of a females; who has, had, will have or would
have, but for a developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the
reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes
sperm for fertilization;
(d) "Sex" means an individual's biological sex, either male or female, as
observed or clinically verified at birth. Gender identity and other subjective
terms shall not be used as synonyms or substitutes for sex; and
(e) "Sleeping quarters" means a room with more than one (1) bed and in
which more than one (1) individual is housed overnight.
(2) A jail shall designate each multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, and
sleeping quarters for the exclusive use of either females, males, or members of
the same family.
(3) (a) A restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarters within a jail that is
designated for females or males shall be used only by members of that sex.
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 424
An individual shall not enter a restroom, changing room, or sleeping
quarters that is designated for females or males unless he or she is a
member of that sex.
(b) A jail shall take reasonable steps to provide individuals with privacy in
restrooms, changing rooms, and sleeping quarters from members of the
opposite sex.
(4) This section does not apply to an individual who enters a restroom, changing
room, or sleeping quarters designated for the opposite sex to:
(a) Perform custodial services or maintenance;
(b) Render medical assistance;
(c) Render assistance by law enforcement; or
(d) Provide services or render aid during a natural disaster, a declared
emergency, or when necessary to prevent a serious threat to good order or
safety.
(5) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a jail from adopting policies
necessary to accommodate persons protected under the Americans with
Disabilities Act when using restrooms, changing rooms, or sleeping quarters.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:15 PM Jacketed